Arkansas, session 2025, HB1952.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-22-101(3), concerning definitions
pertaining to combative sporting events, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) “Combative sports” means boxing, kick boxing, wrestling,
professional wrestling, martial arts, Muay Thai, or any combination thereof,
or any form of hand-to-hand, elbow-and-foot, or foot-and-leg competition in
which:
(i) A blow is struck which may reasonably be expected
to inflict injury; or
(ii) A surface for fighting is used that may reasonably
be expected to inflict injury.
(B) “Combative sports” does not include student training or
*LGL190*
04/01/2025 11:41:09 AM LGL190

HB1952
an exhibition of a student's skill when:
(i) Conducted by a martial arts school or an
association of martial arts schools;
(ii) The student's participation is for health and
recreational purposes rather than competition;
(iii) The intent is to use only partial contact; and
(iv) The scoring technique is based only on points.
(C) “Combative sports” does not include professional
wrestling;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-22-204(a), concerning the authority of
the State Athletic Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) The State Athletic Commission shall have the sole
discretion, management, control, and jurisdiction over all combative sports
matches and exhibitions in this state.
(B)(i) The commission shall adopt uniform policies, fees,
and forms to ensure fair regulation of the combative sports industry.
(ii) The commission shall have no authority over
professional wrestling events.
(2) A combative sports match or exhibition declared to be amateur
and self-regulated shall be governed by the commission unless sanctioned by:
(A) A federally recognized sanctioning body approved in
writing by the commission; and
(B) A national oversight body with 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)
status under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 operating in at least six (6)
states approved in writing by the commission.
(3) A professional wrestling event with one thousand five
hundred (1,500) or more attendees shall be governed by the commission.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-22-302(f), concerning the training and
certification of referees and judges for professional combative sports
events, is amended to read as follows:
(f)(1) A referee or judge for professional events shall attend
training courses given by and obtain certification from the Association of
Boxing Commissions or other sanctioned organization approved by the State
Athletic Commission for the referee or judge's discipline.
04/01/2025 11:41:09 AM LGL190

HB1952
(2) A referee or judge may take the courses provided by the
Association of Boxing Commissions or other sanctioned organization approved
by the State Athletic Commission anywhere in the United States if
documentation of training and certification is provided upon application for
a license.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-22-306(a), concerning fees for combative
sports events, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Within five (5) business days after a combative sports match or
exhibition, the licensed manager, promoter, or person responsible for the
match or exhibition shall furnish to the State Athletic Commission a written
report under the penalty of perjury on a form that shall be provided by the
commission showing the number of tickets or subscriptions for physical
admission that were issued or sold and the gross receipts therefor without
any deductions whatsoever.
(2)(A) The person shall also pay to the commission at the same
time a five-percent fee of the total gross receipts received from admission
charges for each match or exhibition held under the authority of this
chapter.
(B) The five percent (5%) shall be computed using gross gate
receipts, unless the venue collects and remits sales tax for the promoter.
(C) If the venue collects and remits sales tax for the
promoter, the five percent (5%) shall be computed on the net gate receipts
after sales tax.
(D)(i) If a promoter allows admission to a match or
exhibition in return for a payment other than the cash purchase of tickets,
the commission shall:
(a) Determine the method to be used to calculate
the five-percent value of the gate receipts; or
(b) Set a reasonable price per person to be paid
by the promoter to the commission.
(ii) If the promoter requests a decision from the
commission regarding the payment under this section before the match or
exhibition, the commission shall make the determination and notify the
promoter of the determination before the match or exhibition.
(3)(A) The promoter shall pay:
04/01/2025 11:41:09 AM LGL190

HB1952
(i) Pay all costs of the cost of an event inspector
or investigator present at the event; and
(ii) Reimburse all costs of the commission for the
event, including without limitation:
(a) The cost of each event inspector or
investigator not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per day for
each inspector or investigator;
(b) Per diem, expenses, and travel
reimbursements authorized under § 17-22-204 and § 25-16-901 et seq.;
(c) The event permit processing fee of fifty
dollars ($50.00) authorized under § 17-22-302; and
(d) The national and federal fighter database
fees charged to the commission under § 17-22-206.
(B) The Except as provided under subdivision (a)(3)(D) of
this section, the cost of the event inspector or investigator shall not
exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per day for each inspector or
investigator.
(C) The commission shall:
(i) Determine if there is a need to appoint an
inspector or investigator at an event;
(ii) Determine the number of inspectors or
investigators to be appointed for the event; and
(iii) Notify the promoter in writing before the event
of:
(a) The number of inspectors or investigators to
be appointed;
(b) The cost of the inspectors or investigators;
and
(c) The reasons for the appointment.
(D) [Repealed.]






04/01/2025 11:41:09 AM LGL190